Utah statutes.
63B-6-501.   Revenue bond authorizations.

(1) (a)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(i)  the State Board of Regents, on behalf of the University of Utah, issue, sell, and deliver revenue bonds or other evidences of indebtedness of the University of Utah to borrow money on the credit and income and revenues of the University of Utah, other than appropriations of the Legislature, to finance the cost of constructing, furnishing, and equipping a renovation and expansion of the Robert L. Rice Stadium; and

(ii)  Olympic funds, University funds, and activity revenues be used as the primary revenue sources for repayment of any obligation created under the authority of this Subsection (1).

(b)  The bonds or other evidences of indebtedness authorized may provide up to $50,000,000 together with other amounts necessary to pay costs of issuance, pay capitalized interest, and fund any debt service reserve requirements.

(2) (a)  The State Building Ownership Authority, under authority of Title 63B, Chapter 1, Part 3, State Building Ownership Authority Act, may issue or execute obligations or enter into or arrange for a lease purchase agreement in which participation interests may be created to provide up to $350,000 for the remodeling and completion of the Wasatch Mountain State Park Clubhouse for the Division of Parks and Recreation, together with additional amounts necessary to pay costs of issuance, pay capitalized interest, and fund any debt service reserve requirements.

(b)  The State Building Ownership Authority shall work cooperatively with the Division of Parks and Recreation to seek out the most cost effective and prudent lease purchase plan available.

(c)  It is the intent of the Legislature that park revenues be used as the primary revenue sources for repayment of any obligation created under authority of this Subsection (2).

(3)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(a)  the State Building Ownership Authority, under the authority of Title 63B, Chapter 1, Part 3, State Building Ownership Authority Act, may issue or execute obligations, or enter into or arrange for a lease purchase agreement in which participation interests may be created, to provide up to $6,000,000 for the construction, or acquisition, or both, of liquor stores, together with additional amounts necessary to pay costs of issuance, pay capitalized interest, and fund any debt service requirements; and

(b)  liquor control funds be used as the primary revenue source for the repayment of any obligation created under authority of this Subsection (3).

